Utah statutes.
58-49-6.   Certification of persons qualified in other jurisdictions.

Upon receipt of an application and application fee, and upon the recommendation of the board, the division may waive the examination requirement for an applicant who, at the time of application: (a) holds a valid dietitian license or certificate issued by another state or territory of the United States, provided his qualifications meet the requirements of this chapter; or (b) is registered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration.

